src/morphology/stemparts/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V_KARHETA


0:t    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:t    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:ne     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ne   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ne   V_BACK_3SG_E          ;
0:n   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:n   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:n   V_BACK_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:t   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:n   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:t   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:t   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:ne    V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_VÄHETÄ

0:t    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:t    V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:ne     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ne   V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ne   V_FRONT_3SG_E          ;
0:n   V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:n   V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:n   V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:t   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:n   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:t   V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:t   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:ne    V_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_NIUKETA

0:et    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:et    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:kene     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:kene   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:kene   V_BACK_3SG_E          ;
0:ken   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:ken   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:ken   V_BACK_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:et   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:en   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:e   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:et   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:et   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:kene  V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_JYRKETÄ

0:et    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:et    V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:kene     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:kene   V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:kene   V_FRONT_3SG_E          ;
0:ken   V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:ken   V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:ken   V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:et   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:en   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:e   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:et   V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:et   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:kene  V_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_HAPATA

0:at    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:at    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:pane     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:pane   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:pane   V_BACK_3SG_E          ;
0:pan   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:pan   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:pan   V_BACK_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:at   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:an   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:a   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:at   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:at   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:pane  V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_SUPETA

0:et    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:et    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:pene     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:pene   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:pene   V_BACK_3SG_E          ;
0:pen   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:pen   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:pen   V_BACK_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:et   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:en   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:e   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:et   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:et   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:pene  V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_TYLPETÄ

0:et    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:et    V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:pene     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:pene   V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:pene   V_FRONT_3SG_E          ;
0:pen   V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:pen   V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:pen   V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:et   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:en   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:e   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:et   V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:et   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:pene  V_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_HELPOTA

0:ot    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:ot    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:pone     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:pone   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:pone   V_BACK_3SG_E          ;
0:pon   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:pon   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:pon   V_BACK_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:ot   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:on   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:o   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:ot   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:ot   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:pone  V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_LOITOTA

0:ot    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:ot    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:tone     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:tone   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:tone   V_BACK_3SG_E          ;
0:ton   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:ton   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:ton   V_BACK_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:ot   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:on   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:o   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:ot   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:ot   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:tone  V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_ULOTA

0:ot    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:ot    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:kone     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:kone   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:kone   V_BACK_3SG_E          ;
0:kon   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:kon   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:kon   V_BACK_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:ot   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:on   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:o   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:ot   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:ot   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:kone  V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_ERATA
0:at    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:at    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:kane     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:kane   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:kane   V_BACK_3SG_E          ;
0:kan   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:kan   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:kan   V_BACK_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:at   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:an   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:a   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:at   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:at   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:kane  V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_KAVETA

0:vet    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:vet    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:pene     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:pene   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:pene   V_BACK_3SG_E          ;
0:pen   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:pen   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:pen   V_BACK_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:vet   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:ven   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ve   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:vet   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:vet   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:pene  V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_MÄDÄTÄ

0:dät    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:dät    V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:täne     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:täne   V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:täne   V_FRONT_3SG_E          ;
0:tän   V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:tän   V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:tän   V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:dät   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:dän   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:dä   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:dät   V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:dät   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:täne  V_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_LEUDOTA

0:dot    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:dot    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:tone     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:tone   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:tone   V_BACK_3SG_E          ;
0:ton   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:ton   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:ton   V_BACK_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:dot   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:don   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:do   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:dot   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:dot   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:tone  V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_PIDETÄ

0:det    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:det    V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:tene     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:tene   V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:tene   V_FRONT_3SG_E          ;
0:ten   V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:ten   V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:ten   V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:det   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:den   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:de   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:det   V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:det   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:det   V_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_LÄMMETÄ

0:met    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:met    V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:pene     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:pene   V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:pene   V_FRONT_3SG_E          ;
0:pen   V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:pen   V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:pen   V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:met   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:men   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:me   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:met   V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:met   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:pene  V_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_KIINNETÄ

0:net    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:net    V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:tene     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:tene   V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:tene   V_FRONT_3SG_E          ;
0:ten   V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:ten   V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:ten   V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:net   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:nen   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ne   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:net   V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:net   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:tene  V_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_JULJETA

0:jet    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:jet    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:kene     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:kene   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:kene   V_BACK_3SG_E          ;
0:ken   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:ken   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:kea   V_BACK_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:jet   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:jen   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:je   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:jet   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:jet   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:kene  V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;



LEXICON V_ARVATA


0:t    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:t    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:a     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:a   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:s   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:s   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0     V_BACK_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:t   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:n   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:t   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:t   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:a     V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_YNNÄTÄ

0:t    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:t    V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:ä     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ä   V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0   V_FRONT_3SG_Ä          ;
0:s   V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:s   V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0     V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:t   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:n   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0     V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:t   V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:t   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:ä   V_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_MORKATA

0:at    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:at    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:kaa     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:kaa   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ka   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:kas   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:kas   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:ka    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:at   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:an   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:a   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:at   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:at   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:kaa   V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_YÖKÄTÄ

0:ät    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:ät    V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:kää     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:kää   V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:kä   V_FRONT_3SG_Ä          ;
0:käs   V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:käs   V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:kä    V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:ät   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:än   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ä   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:ät   V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:ät   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:kää   V_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_SIEPATA

0:at    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:at    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:paa     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:paa   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:pa   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:pas   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:pas   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:pa    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:at   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:an   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:a   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:at   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:at   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:paa   V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_VÄLPÄTÄ

0:ät    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:ät    V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:pää     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:pää   V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:pä   V_FRONT_3SG_Ä          ;
0:päs   V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:päs   V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:pä    V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:ät   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:än   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ä   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:ät   V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:ät   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:pää   V_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_LUNTATA

0:at    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:at    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:taa     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:taa   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ta   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:tas   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:tas   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:ta    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:at   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:an   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:a   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:at   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:at   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:taa   V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_LÄNTÄTÄ

0:ät    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:ät    V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:tää     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:tää   V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:tä   V_FRONT_3SG_Ä          ;
0:täs   V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:täs   V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:tä    V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:ät   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:än   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ä   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:ät   V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:ät   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:tää   V_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_KAIVATA

0:vat    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:vat    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:paa     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:paa   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:pa   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:pas   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:pas   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:pa    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:vat   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:van   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:va   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:vat   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:vat   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:paa   V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;
